test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-lähe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lähe: # Noun 'spring'
     lähe+N+Sg+Nom: lähe
     lähe+N+Sg+Gen: lähteen
     lähe+N+Sg+Acc: lähteen
     lähe+N+Sg+Part: lähettä
     lähe+N+Sg+Ill: lähteesse
     lähe+N+Sg+Ine: lähtees
     lähe+N+Sg+Ela: lähteest
     lähe+N+Sg+All: lähteelle
     lähe+N+Sg+Ade: lähteel
     lähe+N+Sg+Abl: lähteelt
     lähe+N+Sg+Tra: lähteeks
     lähe+N+Sg+Ess: lähteennä
     lähe+N+Sg+Exe: lähteent

     lähe+N+Pl+Nom: lähteet
     lähe+N+Pl+Gen: lähtein
     lähe+N+Pl+Acc: lähteet
     lähe+N+Pl+Part: lähteitä
     lähe+N+Pl+Ill: lähteisse
     lähe+N+Pl+Ine: lähteis
     lähe+N+Pl+Ela: lähteist
     lähe+N+Pl+All: lähteille
     lähe+N+Pl+Ade: lähteil
     lähe+N+Pl+Abl: lähteilt
     lähe+N+Pl+Tra: lähteiks
     lähe+N+Pl+Ess: lähteinnä
     lähe+N+Pl+Exe: lähteint
